Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 21 JUNIOR COLLEGES
33-2128. Remedies of an obligee of commission.

An obligee of a commission shall have the right in addition to all other rights which may be conferred on such obligee, subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee;

By mandamus, suit, action or proceedings at law or in equity to compel said commission and the commissioners, officers, agents or employees thereof to perform each and every term, provision and covenant contained in any contract of said commission with or for the benefit of such obligee, and to require the carrying out of any or all such covenants and agreements of said commission or the district and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon said authority by this act.

By suit, action or proceeding in equity, to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful, or the violation of any of the rights of such obligee of said commission.

33-2129. Additional remedies conferrable by commission.

The commission shall have power by its resolution, trust indenture, lease or other contract, to confer upon any obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, or holding a lease, the right (in addition to all rights that may otherwise be conferred), upon the happening of an event of default as defined in such resolution or instrument, by suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction:

To cause possession of any dormitory housing project or any part thereof to be surrendered to any such obligee, which possession may be retained by such bondholder or trustee so long as said commission shall continue in default.

To obtain the appointment of a receiver of any dormitory housing project of said authority or any part thereof, and of the rents and profits therefrom. If such receiver be appointed, he may enter and take possession of such dormitory housing project or any part thereof and (so long as said commission shall continue to be in default) operate and maintain the same, and collect and receive all fees, rents, revenues or other charges thereafter arising therefrom, and shall keep such moneys in a separate account or accounts and apply the same in accordance with the obligation of said commission as the court shall direct.

To require said commission and the commissioners thereof to account as if it and they were the trustees of an express trust.

33-2130. Construction of powers conferred.

Nothing in this act or any other law shall be construed as authorizing a dormitory housing commission to levy or collect taxes or assessments, to create any indebtedness payable out of taxes or assessments, or in any manner to pledge the credit of the junior college district, the state or any subdivision thereof; nor shall any provision of this act or other law be construed as authorizing a dormitory housing commission to mortgage or otherwise encumber property of any kind, real, personal or mixed, or any interest therein, but this section shall not be construed as preventing the pledge of the revenues of a dormitory housing commission as authorized in this act.

33-2131. Exemption of property from execution sale.

All real property of an authority shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution or other judicial process shall issue against the same, nor shall any judgment against a dormitory housing commission be a charge or lien upon its real property; provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to or limit the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by an authority on its rents, fees or revenues.

33-2132. Aid from federal government.

In addition to the powers conferred upon a dormitory housing commission by other provisions of this act, a dormitory housing commission is empowered to borrow money or accept contributions, grants or other financial assistance from the federal government for or in aid of any dormitory housing project within its area of operation, to take over or lease or manage any dormitory housing project or undertaking constructed or owned by the federal government, and to these ends, to comply with such conditions and to make such trust indentures, leases or agreements as may be necessary, convenient or desirable. It is the purpose and intent of this act to authorize every dormitory housing commission to do any and all things necessary or desirable to secure the financial aid or cooperation of the federal government in the undertaking, construction, maintenance or operation of any dormitory housing project by such dormitory housing commission.

33-2133. Tax exemption.

The property of a dormitory housing commission is declared to be public property used for essential public and educational purposes, and such property and a dormitory housing commission shall be exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the city, the county, the state or any political subdivision thereof; except that such commission may contract to pay special charges for sewerage, water, or other special services of like nature, in order to obtain such services, but not as a tax.

33-2134. Reports.

At least once a year, the dormitory housing commission shall file with the clerk a report of its activities for the preceding year together with an accounting of its operations, and shall make recommendations with reference to such additional legislation or other action as it deems necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this act.

33-2135. Termination — Reactivation.

Upon the full payment of all its obligations, including bonds, notes, debentures or debts of any kind, the commissioners of a dormitory housing commission shall convey all properties held or owned by said authority to the junior college district and may, by appropriate resolution, declare their purposes at an end and terminated; upon approval of such resolution by the board of trustees of the junior college district the authority shall be declared inactive and the commissioners relieved of their duties; provided, however, that the commission may be reactivated for new projects, in the same manner as new commissioners are appointed in section 33-2118[, Idaho Code], and such new commissioners shall proceed with all the powers granted in this act.

33-2136. Student centers and student union buildings.

In addition to the powers conferred upon dormitory housing commissions by the other provisions of this chapter, a dormitory housing commission is empowered to acquire, construct, improve, add to, reconstruct, repair, maintain, operate and manage any or all student union buildings and student centers to consist of a building or buildings containing the facilities, equipment and furnishings common to student union buildings and student centers as such buildings and centers exist in the various colleges and universities in the United States, including but without limitation, facilities for the feeding and recreation of students and including all equipment, structures, appurtenances and facilities necessary to supplying such unions and centers with sewer, water, electric, heating, telephone and similar public utility facilities, landscaping, parking space, and streets, roads or alleys necessary for proper ingress and egress. Wherever the words “dormitory project” or “dormitory housing project” appear in this chapter, whether in the singular or plural, they shall be understood to include student union buildings, student centers and facilities as authorized in this section, either singly or in combination with one or more dormitories or similar housing facilities. Wherever the word “dormitory” appears in this chapter, whether singular or plural, it shall be understood to include a student union building or student union center and related facilities as authorized in this section.

33-2137. Imposition and collection of student fees and charges.

In each junior college district in which there shall now or hereafter exist a student union building or student center, there is hereby imposed upon each student in attendance at the college of such district a student union fee for the use and availability of such student union building or student center, the amount of which shall be fixed from time to time by the board of trustees of such district, such fee shall be in addition to all other fees authorized to be imposed by such board of trustees and shall not be subject to any statutory limit which may exist on total fees imposed by such board of trustees. Where such student union building or student center shall have been constructed by a junior college housing commission through the issuance of bonds under this chapter, the proceeds of such student union fees shall be regarded as one of the revenues derived from the operation of the student union building or student center, and such board of trustees and such junior college housing commission are authorized to enter into such agreements as they may see fit with respect to the amounts of such fees and the manner of the collection and disposition thereof. Any such agreement may provide that the fees so fixed shall not be diminished or decreased after the issuance of any such bonds until such bonds shall have been retired.

33-2138. Housing commissions validated.

All junior college housing commissions heretofore created or activated under the provisions of this chapter are hereby declared to be validly organized and legally created public bodies and all acts and proceedings heretofore taken in connection with the creation or activation of such commissions and taken by such commissions for the authorization, sale and issuance of the bonds of such commissions for the purpose of acquiring or constructing dormitory, housing or student union building or center projects, any or all, are hereby validated, confirmed and declared to be legally effective.

33-2139. State community college account created.

There is hereby created a state community college account in the state operating fund in the state treasurer’s office to which shall be credited all moneys that may be transferred pursuant to section 23-404(1)(b)(iii), Idaho Code. The state treasurer shall make such disbursements from the account as may be ordered by the state board of education in accordance with the provisions of this act.

33-2140. Allocation of fund

Formula. [Repealed.]

33-2141. Disbursement of funds — Method — Funds disbursed not considered in fixing tuition.

Funds transferred to the state community college account shall be disbursed quarterly to the qualifying community college districts. Funds disbursed under this act shall not be considered by the board of trustees of any community college in fixing tuition of such college pursuant to section 33-2110, Idaho Code.

33-2142. Direct payment to board — Utilization.

Disbursement shall be by direct payment to the governing board of such Junior College District which board shall utilize and disburse such funds in the furtherance of the academic program which such board is authorized by law to administer.

33-2143. Disposition of funds when junior college ceases to operate.

Should any Junior College cease to operate as a Junior College existing under and by reason of Chapter 21 of Title 33, Idaho Code, during the biennium for which this Act is effective, the Board of Education of the State of Idaho shall compute the amount that such Junior College would be entitled to for the current year during which said Junior College would be inoperative based upon its enrollment for the preceding year during which it was operated and shall return the amount which would have been due such Junior College to the Treasurer of the State of Idaho to be placed in the General Fund of the State of Idaho by said Treasurer, provided, however, that if, during the biennium for which this Act is effective, any Junior College shall be made an institution of higher education of the State of Idaho within the jurisdiction and control of the State Board of Education, said board shall retain the amount which would have otherwise accrued to said Junior College and such funds so retained shall be added to other funds appropriated to said college and use [used] for the maintenance and operation thereof.

33-2144. Disbursement to public employee retirement fund.

The disbursing of funds as provided by sections 33-2139 through 33-2143, Idaho Code, shall be subject to the payments required to be made by section 59-1324, Idaho Code, from the state community college account to the public employee retirement fund. Such payments shall be prior to the payment of funds from the state community college account to the several community college districts as provided by said statute.